Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2315.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14 of the act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act, is amended to read:Section 14. Rules and Regulations.--(a) The commissioner and the secretary are authorized and directed to promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes and provisions of this act.(b) No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, the commissioner and the secretary shall promulgate regulations that require a health maintenance organization to 12345678910111213141516171819202122 not deny payment for basic health services or physicians' services covered under an enrollee's contract solely because the referral was made by a direct primary care provider who is not a participating provider under the health maintenance organization's provider network.(c) As used in this section, the term "direct primary care provider" means an individual who is a licensed allopathic physician, osteopathic physician or other advanced health care practitioner who is authorized to engage in independent medical practice in this Commonwealth and who provides direct health care by entering into a direct health care service agreement with a patient. The term includes an individual health care provider or a group of health care providers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2315PN3072 - 2 - 1234567891011121314